Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB11.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 6 of this Act:
(1) "Interim school board" or "interim board" means the local board of education
of a new independent school district that is elected under to Section 2 of this Act
or any successor board elected, either of which are serving prior to the deadline
to be fully operational established in subsection (4)(h) of Section 4 of this Act;
(2) "Local legislative body" means the:
(a) Legislative body of a consolidated local government or urban-county
government in a county where those governments exist; or
(b) County fiscal court in a county where no consolidated local government or
urban-county government exists;
(3) "New independent school district" or "new independent district" means an
independent school district that is established under Section 2 of this Act;
(4) "Originating school district" or "originating district" means the school district
from which new independent school districts are established under Section 2 of
this Act; and
(5) "Persistently underperforming school district" means a school district that
contains more than fifty percent (50%) of the schools identified for
comprehensive support and improvement under KRS 160.346 during a school
year.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Each year upon the identification of schools for comprehensive support and
improvement, the Kentucky Department of Education shall determine if any
Page 1 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2026 11:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 944
school district is a persistently underperforming school district and provide notice
of the fact to the local legislative body of the county in which the school district is
located.
(2) Within thirty (30) days of the local legislative body receiving notice of the
persistently underperforming school district, the local legislative body shall hold a
public hearing to receive public comment on the state of the persistently
underperforming school district, whether the persistently underperforming school
district should be divided, and where the boundaries of any new independent
school districts derived from the persistently underperforming school district
should be located. All persons desiring to be heard shall be given an opportunity
to present oral testimony. The local legislative body may set reasonable time limits
for testimony. The local legislative body shall advertise the hearing by causing the
following to be published at least twice for two (2) consecutive weeks, in the
newspaper of largest circulation in the county, a display type advertisement of not
less than twelve (12) column inches:
(a) The purpose of the hearing under this subsection; and
(b) The time and place for the hearing which shall be held not less than
seven (7) days nor more than ten (10) days after the day that the
second advertisement is published.
(3) (a) No sooner than thirty (30) days and no later than ninety (90) days after the
public hearing, the local legislative body shall hold a specially called
meeting to consider whether the question of dividing the persistently
underperforming school districts into two (2) or more new independent
school districts shall be submitted to the voters.
(b) To submit the question of division to the voters, the local legislative body
shall adopt by majority vote a map detailing the boundaries of the proposed
new independent school districts. The local legislative body shall only
Page 2 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2026 11:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 944
submit one (1) proposed map to the voters. The proposed map shall:
1. Divide the persistently underperforming school district into at least
two (2) new independent school districts of substantially similar area,
population, and property assessment value;
2. Completely divide the area of the persistently underperforming school
district and affect no other school districts;
3. Contain integral voting precincts insofar as is practical; and
4. Include streets, highways, political boundaries, and other similar
landmarks that make understanding the proposed map easier to read.
(c) If the local legislative body either does not adopt a proposed map under
paragraph (a) of this subsection or determines to not propose division by a
majority vote at the meeting, the question shall not be submitted to the
voters.
(d) If the local legislative body adopts a proposed map under subsection (3)(a)
of this section, the proposed map and notice of the adoption of the proposed
map shall be delivered to the county clerk within five (5) days of the
adoption.
(4) Upon receipt of the proposed map and the notice under subsection (3) of this
section, the county clerk shall:
(a) Direct that the questions in subsections (8)(a) and (b) of this section shall be
placed on the ballot for the next regular election to be held in that county;
(b) Begin to accept petitions for nomination for the provisional election of
members of the interim boards of education that would be established upon
the establishment of the new independent school districts as provided in
subsection (9) of this section; and
(c) Advertise the proposed map approved by the local legislative body under
subsection (3) of this section by causing the proposed map to be published
Page 3 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2026 11:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 944
as a display type advertisement of not less than twelve (12) column inches at
least twice for two (2) consecutive weeks in the newspaper of largest
circulation in the county during the thirty (30) days prior to the next regular
election.
(5) The eligibility requirements, number of members, and election requirements
applied to other independent school districts under KRS Chapter 160 shall apply
to the provisional election of the interim boards as though the proposed new
independent districts were already in existence.
(6) The general election laws, including penalties for violations, shall apply to the
election for the proposed new independent districts and the provisional election of
an interim board of the proposed new independent districts required in this
section, except where these laws are inconsistent with this section.
(7) No later than the fourth Tuesday preceding an election at which the proposition
under this section is to be submitted to the voters, any committee that in good
faith advocates or opposes the establishment of the new independent districts may
file a petition with the county clerk asking that the petitioners be recognized as
the committee entitled to nominate challengers for the question in subsection
(8)(a) of this section to serve at the election at which the question of division is to
be voted on. The requirements and procedures regarding challengers under this
subsection shall be the same as provided in KRS 117.315(4), (5), and (6), 117.316,
117.317, and 117.318.
(8) The proposition of establishing new independent school districts under this
section shall submit two (2) questions to the voters as follows:
(a) The first question shall be on the division of the persistently
underperforming school district and shall be submitted to all voters residing
in the school district. The question to be voted upon shall be stated without
emblems and voters shall designate a "Yes" or a "No" vote. The form of the
Page 4 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2026 11:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 944
question shall be: "Are you in favor of the dissolution of (name of school
district) and the establishment of new independent school districts as
proposed by (name of local legislative body) to serve the residents of the new
districts and be governed by elected local boards of education with authority
to raise taxes for educational purposes?"; and
(b) The second question shall be on the provisional membership of the interim
boards of education of the new independent districts and shall be submitted
to the voters residing in the proposed new independent school districts
independently. The form of the proposition for the provisional election of
the interim board members shall be: "If a new independent school district is
established, who should serve as the members of the interim board of
education for the district?"
(9) If the majority of votes cast in the election on establishing a new independent
district under subsection (8)(a) of this section are:
a. "No," then the election of the members of the interim board of education
shall be void; or
b. "Yes," then the election of the interim board of education shall be binding
and the five (5) candidates receiving the most votes shall be elected to the
board.
(10) The ballot containing an election establishing a new independent school district
and a provisional election of an interim board of education for the proposed new
independent school district shall have the question of the establishment of the
new independent district appear on the ballot before the provisional election of an
interim board of education. The two (2) questions shall appear on the ballot in
proximity to each other.
(11) The county clerk shall conspicuously post the proposed map approved by the
local legislative body under subsection (3) of this section at each precinct polling
Page 5 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2026 11:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 944
place and make copies available to voters at each polling place upon request.
(12) The results of the election shall be certified by the county board of elections. The
certificate of the result shall be immediately filed with the county clerk and the
certificate, or an attested copy thereof, shall be prima facie evidence of the result
of the election.
(13) The questions in subsection (8) of this section shall be subject to the same
recount, contest, canvass, and recanvass provisions and procedures as set forth in
KRS 242.120.
(14) (a) Any interim board members elected under subsection (8)(b) of this section
shall assume office upon certification of the election results and serve on
the interim board until January 1 following the next regular election in an
even year.
(b) Notwithstanding KRS 160.200, upon the end of the term of any members
elected under subsection (8)(b) of this section, as set out in paragraph (a) of
this subsection, the three (3) members elected during the regular election in
an even year with the most votes shall then take office and serve four (4)
year terms. The remaining members elected during that election shall serve
an initial two (2) year term, with subsequent terms being for four (4) years.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Upon the certification of an election result that establishes new independent
school districts and interim boards of education under Section 2 of this Act, the
interim boards shall have all the powers, authority, and responsibilities of any
other local board of education, except for the transitional provisions provided in
this section and Sections 4, 5, and 6 of this Act. Any vacancy in membership of an
interim board shall be filled in the same manner as KRS 160.190.
(2) The board of education of the originating district shall continue serving as the
Page 6 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2026 11:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 944
board of education of the originating district until the district's dissolution.
(3) Upon the certification of an election result that establishes new independent
districts and interim boards under Section 2 of this Act, the Kentucky Department
of Education shall conduct a calculation of the total assets and liabilities held by
the originating district. The calculation shall comply with the following:
(a) The calculation shall be an amount in dollars for both total assets and total
liabilities;
(b) The department shall develop a list of assets and liabilities and the values
assigned to each. Classes of individual items may collectively be given an
assigned value based on an average valuation;
(c) The liabilities shall include all the debt service of the originating district,
including debt for construction and the purchase of equipment for the
originating district;
(d) The department shall then calculate the projected tax assessments for each
of the new independent districts. Based on the proportion of each of the new
independent district's projected tax assessments, the department shall assign
an amount in dollars of both assets and liabilities. These shall be the initial
assigned value of assets and liabilities for each district;
(e) Until the transfer of assets and liabilities outlined in subsection (8) of this
section, and excluding any required funds transferred in Section 4 of this
Act, the originating district shall maintain control and use of its the assets
and shall be responsible for their maintenance. An amount of assets
assigned to the new independent district in paragraph (d) of this subsection
shall be restricted and shall only be used, disposed of, or expended to
provide essential education services for currently enrolled students. The
originating district's use of these funds shall require approval of the
department; and
Page 7 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2026 11:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 944
(f) Prior to the deadline for the new independent districts to be fully
operational established in subsection (4)(h) of Section 4 of this Act, as the
originating district continues to make any payments on debts, the amounts
shall be attributed in the same proportional manner as in paragraph (d) of
this subsection.
(4) The interim board of education of the new independent districts shall conduct
negotiations to agree to the division of the originating district's assets and
liabilities. Each new independent district shall be entitled to an amount of assets
assigned by the department under subsection (3) of this section. The negotiation
shall resolve:
(a) The disposition of any of the originating district's real property that is
located within the boundaries of the new independent districts;
(b) The division of any liquid assets, accounts receivable, and intangible assets
held by or owed to the originating district;
(c) The specific liabilities each district shall receive individually or shall share
between the districts;
(d) The division, in bulk or individually, of the originating district's desks,
books, computers, projectors, televisions, phones, school buses,
automobiles, furniture, equipment, supplies, and other tangible personal
property owned by the originating school district; and
(e) The continuation, modification, assignment, or termination of
nonemployment contracts agreed to by the originating district.
(5) The boards of education shall conclude negotiations and enter an agreed division
of the originating district's assets and liabilities by November 1 following the
establishing of the new independent districts. The agreement may provide a
timeline for the general transfer of assets and liabilities and may also provide for
a timeline for the transfer of specific assets. If any matter remains unresolved
Page 8 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2026 11:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 944
after the deadline established in this subsection, the matters shall be presented to
the commissioner of education or designee for resolution pursuant to subsection
(6) of this section. Any proposed agreement to the division of the originating
district's assets shall be agreed to by a majority vote of each district's board of
education.
(6) On issues the boards cannot come to agreement under subsections (4) and (5) of
this section, a board may appeal to the commissioner of education or designee to
determine an equitable resolution of the disagreement. In any determination, the
decision shall prioritize the successful operation of each district. The matter shall
be decided within thirty (30) days of the submission. The commissioner or
designee shall notify the districts of the decision. The decision may be appealed to
the Kentucky Board of Education at its next regular meeting.
(7) If any disagreement between the boards remains unresolved after the passage of
the deadlines in subsections (5) and (6) of this section, the Kentucky Department
of Education shall assess a fine to the districts in the amount of the dispute in
question with the fine divided proportionally in the same manner as in subsection
(3)(d) of this section and the fine shall be placed in the fund to support education
excellence in Kentucky.
(8) By the second June 30 following the establishment of the new independent
districts, the transfer of all assets and debts identified in the agreement made
under subsection (5) of this section or resolved under subsection (6) of this
section shall be determined and completed and the originating school district
shall be dissolved.
(9) The originating district shall continue to exercise taxing authority over the new
independent districts and shall collect revenues. For the tax year in which the
deadline to be fully operational established in subsection (4)(h) of Section 4 of
this Act occurs, the amounts collected by the originating district shall be
Page 9 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2026 11:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 944
distributed proportionally between the new independent districts in the same
manner as in subsection (3)(d) of this section. Upon the close of that tax year, the
new independent districts shall be responsible for collecting the taxes within the
boundaries of the districts as otherwise provided by law thereafter.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) When a new independent school district is established under Section 2 of this Act,
the county judge/executive of the county in which it is established shall call the
interim local board of education to meet within ten (10) days.
(2) At the first meeting, the interim board shall only:
(a) Take the oath of office;
(b) Elect a chair and vice chair;
(c) Discuss potential policies of the interim board;
(d) Discuss the appointment of a superintendent, secretary, and treasurer under
KRS Chapter 160; and
(e) Determine whether the board shall seek assistance from the commissioner
of education pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.
(3) An interim board may request technical assistance from the Kentucky
Department of Education by submitting a request to the commissioner of
education. Upon receiving a request, the commissioner shall direct department
staff to provide technical assistance to the board in developing the transition
required under subsection (4) of this section.
(4) In transitioning the new independent district into a fully functional district, the
interim board and new independent district shall conform with the following:
(a) The interim board shall develop, adopt, maintain, and comply with the
transition plan required under Section 6 of this Act;
(b) By January 1 after its establishment, the interim board shall develop an
Page 10 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2026 11:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 944
interim budget for the operations of the new independent district for the
remainder of the fiscal year that will only include the costs of critical
operations of the board, such as salaries, supplies, offices, and other
expenses necessary for the board to function. The chair of the board shall
submit the interim budget to the commissioner of education for approval.
Within five (5) days, the commissioner shall approve or disapprove the
proposed budget. If the proposed budget is disapproved, the interim board
may resubmit an amended budget or appeal the commissioner's decision to
the Kentucky Board of Education at its next regular meeting. Once a budget
has been approved, the department shall require the originating district to
transfer the approved amounts to the new independent district in regular
installments. If the originating district fails to transfer the funds, the
amounts shall be deducted from the funds transferred to the originating
district from the fund to support education excellence in Kentucky. These
amounts shall be deducted from the new independent district's assets
assigned in subsection (3) of Section 3 of this Act;
(c) In a timely manner, the interim board shall:
1. Appoint an interim superintendent for the new independent district to
assist the board in executing the transition. Any contract between an
interim superintendent and an interim board shall not extend past the
deadline for the new independent district to be fully operational
established in paragraph (h) of this subsection, but may subsequently
be renewed by the board;
2. Appoint a secretary and a treasurer for the board; and
3. Select counsel for the board;
(d) Upon the direction of the interim board, the interim superintendent shall
hire district staff critical for the operations of the interim board, including
Page 11 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2026 11:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 944
but not limited to a district finance officer. Notwithstanding any statute to
the contrary, any hiring or termination made by the interim superintendent
prior to the deadline established in paragraph (h) of this subsection shall be
subject to ratification by the interim board;
(e) By May 1 following the establishment of the new independent district, the
interim board shall develop a budget for the operations of the district for the
following fiscal year. The chair of the board shall submit the budget to the
commissioner of education for approval. The budget under this paragraph
shall be subject to the same provisions as the interim budget in paragraph
(b) of this subsection but shall include additional district staff required for
the continued development of district operations;
(f) By the second January 1 following the establishment of the new
independent district, the interim board shall:
1. Identify the schools that the board intends to establish within the
district at the start of the next school year, the grades and programs to
be operated within those schools, and the number of staff and the staff
positions that will be placed at those schools; and
2. Develop a special budget designed to build up the district's operations
necessary to provide a minimum school term as defined in KRS
158.070 during the following school year. The budget under this
subparagraph shall be subject to the same provisions as the interim
budget in paragraph (b) of this subsection but shall include funds
needed prior to the beginning of the next school year for:
a. The hiring of principals and other school staff required for
preparations;
b. District and school facilities and additional supplies or tangible
personal property not provided for in the agreement in
Page 12 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2026 11:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 944
subsection (4) of Section 3 of this Act; and
c. Contract services that are needed to support district and school
operations;
(g) Notwithstanding KRS 160.345, upon the authorization by the interim board:
1. The interim superintendent shall select and hire the principals for the
district's schools, subject to the ratification of the interim board; and
2. The principals shall begin hiring school staff for the following school
year, with the hiring subject to the ratification of the interim
superintendent; and
(h) The second July 1 following the establishment of the new independent
school district shall be the deadline for the district to be fully operational
and the interim board shall ensure the district is prepared to provide full
services to the students of the new independent school district for the
coming school year.
(5) An interim board of a new independent district may request a waiver of the
timeline established in subsection (4) of this section to the commissioner of
education or designee, except that no waiver shall be granted to alter the deadline
established in subsection (4)(h) of this section. The commissioner or designee
shall approve or deny the request within five (5) days of the submission. In
approving a waiver, the commissioner or designee shall establish a new deadline
that would reasonably ensure the new independent school district is fully
operational by the second July 1 following the establishment of the new
independent school district. A denial may be appealed to the Kentucky Board of
Education at its next regular meeting.
(6) If during the transition established under this section the interim board identifies
a statute or administrative regulation that inhibits the new independant district's
ability to be fully operational as required under subsection (4)(h) of this section,
Page 13 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2026 11:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 944
the interim board may submit a request to the Kentucky Board of Education to
temporarily waive the statute or administrative regulation. The request shall
identify the specific statute or administrative regulation, the rationale for the
needed waiver, and the duration the waiver is needed. The Kentucky Board of
Education shall consider the request at its next regular meeting and, if the
request is approved, the state board shall identify the duration of the waiver that
shall not extend past the conclusion of the first fully operational school year.
(7) The interim board may enter into a contract with another board of education to
provide support services for the new independent district, including financial
management and payroll services. The contract shall not extend beyond the
deadline established in subsection (4)(h) of this section. However, the contract
may subsequently be renewed by the board.
(8) Notwithstanding any other provision of Sections 1 to 6 of this Act, if, prior to the
deadline established in subsection (4)(h) of this section, each of the interim
boards of new independent districts within an originating school district
determines by a four-fifths (4/5) vote that the establishment of the new
independent district is not financially viable, then the chair of each interim board
shall submit notice of the vote to the board of education of the originating district
and the commissioner of education and the commissioner shall establish the
timeline and the process for the new independent districts and interim boards to
cease functions and merge back into the originating school district.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Upon the deadline to become fully functional in subsection (4)(h) of Section 4 of
this Act, the new independent district shall be prepared to provide services to the
students of the district and the interim board shall no longer serve as an interim
but shall exercise the full authorities of a local board of education, except for the
Page 14 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2026 11:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 944
provisions of this section and Section 6 of this Act. Both the originating district
and the local board of education of the originating district shall cease operation
and shall be dissolved.
(2) For any debts assessed to the new independent district under Section 3 of this Act,
any tax levied by the originating district that was authorized for the purposes of
paying a specific debt or interest shall continue to be levied and collected within
the boundaries of the new independent district by the new independent district's
board in accordance with the laws under which the levies were originally made
until all the associated obligations of the originating district have been retired.
(3) Notwithstanding the requirements under KRS 160.345, the new independent
district shall not be required to implement school-based decision making in the
district for the first fully operational school year, but shall adopt a process to seek
the feedback of parents and school faculty during that year. The district shall be
subject to KRS 160.345 with the start of the second fully operational year.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The interim board shall develop, adopt, maintain, and comply with a transition
plan for the new independent district that shall guide the transition process for
the new independent district until the close of the first fully operational school
year.
(2) The interim board may request assistance in developing and maintaining the
transition plan from the commissioner of education who shall provide expertise
and guidance from the Kentucky Department of Education for the interim
board's plan.
(3) The transition plan shall include, at a minimum:
(a) The aspects required in subsection (4) of Section 4 of this Act;
(b) An assessment detailing the new independent district's number of school-
Page 15 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2026 11:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 944
aged residents and projections for the first fully operational school year's
total enrollment and enrollment by grade;
(c) The schools, grades, and programs the district will offer;
(d) The facilities that the district will maintain to house those schools, grades,
and programs that includes a facilities plan for the first fully operational
year;
(e) The transportation services the district will provide to students that includes
a transportation plan for the first fully operational year;
(f) The food services the district will provide to students that includes a food
services plan for the first fully operational year;
(g) The process the district will follow in conforming to the Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act, the Americans with Disabilities Act, and the
Rehabilitation Act of 1973;
(h) The staffing plan for the district that includes teacher and staff assignments
to specific schools for the first fully operational year;
(i) The procedures and advisory bodies established to seek parent and school
faculty feedback during the first fully operational year as required under
Section 5 of this Act;
(j) Notwithstanding the requirements in KRS 158.070 for a school district
calendar committee, establish the school calendar for the first fully
operational school year;
(k) A district technology plan that provides for the technological needs of the
district and schools throughout the transition and the first fully operational
school year;
(l) Transition services for high school students to ensure that students remain
on track to graduate during the transition and the first fully operational
school year; and
Page 16 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2026 11:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 944
(m) During the first fully operational school year, whether and how the new
independent district will offer the following:
1. Preschool and kindergarten;
2. Career and technical education;
3. Student health services; and
4. Family resource and youth service centers.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 157 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "originating school district" and "new independent
school district" have the same meanings as in Section 1 of this Act.
(2) Notwithstanding any provisions of this chapter to the contrary, when a new
independent school district is established under Sections 1 to 6 of this Act, the
calculation of the funds from the fund to support education excellence in
Kentucky that are due to new independent school districts for the first fully
operational school year shall:
(a) For purposes of average daily attendance, be based on each districts'
projected enrollment and the originating district's average daily attendance
from the prior school year; and
(b) For purposes of aggregate daily attendance of students transported, be
based on each districts' projected enrollment and a transportation plan
submitted to the Kentucky Department of Education by the new independent
districts.
(3) The calculations required in subsection (2) of this section shall be adjusted by the
Kentucky Department of Education in January of the first fully operational
school year to reflect the first semester's actual data.
(4) Following the first fully operational school year, funding for subsequent years of
operation shall be calculated as otherwise provided in this chapter.
Page 17 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2026 11:58 AM Jacketed